Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 3. Education and Research.

Sec. 17.30.140.
Education and research.

The commissioner of health and social services shall provide for educational programs designed to prevent and deter the abuse of controlled substances. In connection with these programs, the commissioner may

assist the regulated industry and interested groups and organizations in contributing to the reduction of abuse of controlled substances;

promote better recognition of the problems surrounding abuse of controlled substances within the regulated industry and among interested groups and organizations;

consult with interested groups and organizations to aid them in solving administrative and organizational problems;

evaluate procedures, projects, and techniques conducted or proposed as part of educational programs on abuse of controlled substances;

disseminate the results of research on abuse of controlled substances to promote a better public understanding of the problems which exist and their solutions; and

with the cooperation of the Department of Law, assist in the education and training of state and local law enforcement officials in their efforts to prevent illicit traffic in and abuse of controlled substances.

The commissioner of health and social services shall encourage research on controlled substances and may

establish methods to assess the effects of controlled substances and identify and characterize those with potential for abuse;

make studies and undertake research to

develop new or improved approaches, techniques, systems, equipment, and devices to strengthen the enforcement of this chapter;

determine patterns of abuse of controlled substances and their social effects; and

improve methods for preventing, predicting, and understanding the abuse of controlled substances;

enter into contracts with public agencies, institutions of higher education, and private organizations or individuals for conducting research, demonstrations, or special projects which bear directly on abuse of controlled substances and for related research and educational activities.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982)